Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
Article 2 Dimensions and Weight of Vehicles and Loads

Cross references.

Powers and duties of state fire marshal with regard to sale and storage of liquified petroleum gas, §

10-1-260

et seq.

Authority of Commissioner of Agriculture to stop and inspect commercial vehicles pursuant to enforcement of weights and measures law, §

10-2-6

.

Required equipment for motor vehicles generally, T. 40, C. 8.

Georgia Forest Product Trucking Rules, §

46-1-1

.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Permits for vehicles or loads of excess weight or dimension, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, State Department of Transportation, Chapter 672-2.

Public school bus inspection, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Public Safety, Chapter 570-31.

32-6-20.
General restrictions.

No vehicle or load shall be operated or moved upon the public roads of Georgia if a dimension or the weight of such vehicle or load exceeds the limitations specified in Code Sections 32-6-22 through 32-6-24 or in Code Section 32-6-26 unless exempted in Code Section 32-6-25 or authorized to do so by a permit issued pursuant to Code Section 32-6-28.

History.

Ga. L. 1927, p. 226, § 15; Code 1933, § 68-401; Code 1933, § 95A-953, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

Cross references.

Observing laws by motor carriers, §

40-1-122

.

32-6-21.
Redesignated.

Reserved. Redesignated as Code Section 40-6-248.1 by Ga. L. 2006, p. 275, § 3-9/HB 1320, effective July 1, 2006.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 275, § 3-9/HB 1320, redesignated former Code Section 32-6-21 as present Code Section 40-6-248.1.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 275, § 4-1/HB 1320 reserved the designation of this Code section.

32-6-22.
Height of vehicles and loads.

Except as authorized in subsection (b) of this Code section and except when so authorized by a permit issued pursuant to Code Section 32-6-28, no vehicle unladen or with a load shall exceed a height of 13 feet, six inches.

On highways which constitute a part of The Dwight D. Eisenhower System of Interstate and Defense Highways as such term is used in 23 U.S.C. Section 127 and ramps or service streets which provide reasonable access thereto, no vehicle transporting motor vehicles (commonly known as automobile carriers) unladen or with a load shall exceed a height of 14 feet.

History.

Ga. L. 1927, p. 226, § 15; Code 1933, § 68-401; Ga. L. 1941, p. 449, § 1; Ga. L. 1956, p. 83, § 2; Ga. L. 1959, p. 27, § 1; Ga. L. 1964, p. 83, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 30, § 1; Code 1933, § 95A-956, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1010, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 136, § 32.

32-6-23.
Width of vehicles and loads.

Unless otherwise provided in this Code section or exempted in Code Section 32-6-25 or so authorized by a permit issued pursuant to Code Section 32-6-28, no vehicle shall exceed a total outside width, including any load thereon, of 102 inches, exclusive of mirrors and accessories attached thereto, when operated on any street, road, or highway.

History.

Ga. L. 1927, p. 226, § 15; Code 1933, § 68-401; Ga. L. 1941, p. 449, § 1; Ga. L. 1951, p. 772, § 1; Ga. L. 1956, p. 83, § 2; Ga. L. 1959, p. 27, § 1; Ga. L. 1964, p. 83, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 30, § 1; Code 1933, § 95A-957, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 439, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1798, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 32; Ga. L. 1984, p. 621, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 567, § 1.

32-6-24.
Length of vehicles and loads.

As used in this article, the term:

“Bimodal semitrailer” means a detachable load-carrying unit designed to be attached to a coupling on the rear of a truck tractor by which it is partly supported during movement over the highway and designed either with retractable flanged wheels or to attach to a detachable flanged wheel assembly for movement on the rails.

“Combination of vehicles” means a semitrailer pulled by a truck tractor or a semitrailer and trailer pulled by a truck tractor operating in a truck tractor-semitrailer-trailer combination.

“Extendable semitrailer” means a semitrailer that has been manufactured for the purpose of extending the frame to increase the overall length for the purpose of transporting single-piece loads.

“NHS” means the National Highway System.

“Semitrailer” means a detachable load-carrying unit designed to be attached to a coupling on the rear of a truck tractor by which it is partly supported.

“Trailer” means a detachable load-carrying unit designed to be attached to a coupling at the rear of a semitrailer and capable of support in operation without the truck tractor.

“Truck tractor” means the noncargo-carrying power unit that operates in combination with a semitrailer or trailer, except that a truck tractor and semitrailer engaged in the transportation of automobiles may transport motor vehicles on part of the power unit.

Unless exempted in Code Section 32-6-25 or so authorized by a permit issued pursuant to Code Section 32-6-28, the following length limits shall apply:

Trailer and semitrailer lengths:

Truck tractor-semitrailer-trailer combinations shall have trailers and semitrailers that do not exceed 28 feet in length;

Truck tractor-semitrailer combinations shall have semitrailers that do not exceed 53 feet in length, unless signs are posted that indicate semitrailer length restrictions;

On interstate and NHS routes, single-piece loads may be transported on an extendable semitrailer that exceeds 53 feet, provided that no pieces will be loaded end to end and the semitrailer does not exceed 75 feet in length; on roads other than the interstate and NHS routes, the foregoing provisions of this subparagraph shall also apply, except that the overall length shall not exceed 100 feet. Empty extendable semitrailers or extendable semitrailers transporting a single-piece load of 53 feet or less shall be required to maintain a semitrailer length of 53 feet or less. When the semitrailer is extended as described in this subparagraph, the rear extremity of each extendable semitrailer or load shall be marked with a four-inch multidirectional amber strobe light and with 18 inch bright red or orange warning flags on the rearmost of the load or semitrailer;

Maxi-cube combinations shall have a cargo box that does not exceed 34 feet, provided that the pair of cargo boxes together does not exceed 60 feet and the overall length, including the power unit, does not exceed 65 feet; and

Trailer and semitrailer length requirements in this paragraph shall not apply to automobile and boat transporters; however, no unit of the vehicle shall exceed 56 feet in length; and

Overall truck tractor-semitrailer or truck tractor-semitrailer-trailer lengths:

Maxi-cube combinations shall have an overall length that does not exceed 65 feet;

Saddlemount and saddlemount with fullmount combinations shall have an overall length that does not exceed 97 feet; and

All other combinations of truck tractor-semitrailer or truck tractor-semitrailer-trailer operated on roads other than interstate or the NHS shall have an overall length that does not exceed 100 feet, unless signs are posted that indicate length restrictions. This maximum length shall include the federal allowance for automobile and boat transporter loads to overhang up to three feet over the front of the vehicle and overhang up to six feet over the rear of the vehicle.

History.

Ga. L. 1927, p. 226, § 15; Code 1933, § 68-401; Ga. L. 1956, p. 83, § 2; Ga. L. 1959, p. 27, § 1; Ga. L. 1964, p. 83, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 30, § 1; Code 1933, § 95A-958, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1422, §§ 35, 36; Ga. L. 1979, p. 439, § 2; Ga. L. 1980, p. 576, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1981, p. 133, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1798, § 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1002, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 414, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1030, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1569, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 693, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 255, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 32; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2467, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 786, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 990, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1010, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 567, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 828, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 136, § 32; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1654, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 32; Ga. L. 2010, p. 442, § 1/HB 1174; Ga. L. 2017, p. 720, § 1/HB 328.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, substituted “six feet” for “four feet” near the end of the last sentence of subparagraph (b)(2)(C).

Cross references.

Light, flag, or strobe lamp on projecting load, §

40-8-27

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, “term” was substituted for “terms” at the end of the introductory language of subsection (a).

32-6-25.
Exemptions for farming, agricultural, and forest management equipment.

The limitations of Code Section 32-6-23 as to width and of Code Section 32-6-24 as to length shall not apply to the following loads and vehicles, which may exceed such limitation without a permit: farming or agricultural equipment or forest management equipment, whether self-propelled or being hauled, when such vehicle or equipment is being operated during daylight hours upon a public road not part of The Dwight D. Eisenhower System of Interstate and Defense Highways by dealers or by the owner thereof or his agent within a radius of 40 miles of the property of the dealer or owner. The foregoing exemptions do not apply to vehicles hauling or transporting forest products.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 206, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 30, § 1; Code 1933, § 95A-954, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 532, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 136, § 32.

32-6-25.1.
Exemptions for port vehicles used to transport cargo or containers.

The limitations of Code Section 32-6-23 as to width and of Code Section 32-6-24 as to length shall not apply to the following loads and vehicles, which may exceed such limitation without a permit: Any vehicle or equipment used for transporting cargo or containers between and within wharves, storage areas, or terminals within the facilities of any port under the jurisdiction of the Georgia Ports Authority when such vehicle or equipment is being operated upon any public road not part of The Dwight D. Eisenhower System of Interstate and Defense Highways by the owner thereof or his or her agent within a radius of ten miles of the port facility of origin and accompanied by an escort vehicle equipped with one or more operating amber flashing lights that are visible from a distance of 500 feet.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-6-25.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 784, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 136, § 32.

32-6-26.
Weight of vehicle and load.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Federal bridge formula” means:

Click to view

Where W = the overall gross weight on any group of two or more consecutive axles to the nearest 500 pounds, L = the distance in feet between the extreme of any group of two or more consecutive axles, and N = the number of axles in the group under consideration.

LN

W = 500
_______________
+
12 N + 36

N-1

Click to view

“Lift axle” means any axle on any vehicle manufactured after July 1, 1978, which axle may be raised or lowered with respect to the horizontal plane of the vehicle.

“Single axle” means all the wheels whose centers may be included between two parallel transverse vertical planes 40 inches apart.

“State bridge formula” means:

Click to view

Where W = the maximum allowable gross weight of the vehicle or combination of vehicles to the nearest 500 pounds, L = the distance in feet between the first and last axles of the vehicle or combination of vehicles, and N = the number of axles on the vehicle or combination of vehicles.

Click to view

LN

W = 500
_______________
+
12 N + 36

N-1

“Tandem axle” means two or more consecutive axles, excluding the steering axle, which extend across the full width of the vehicle and whose centers may be included between parallel vertical planes spaced more than 40 inches apart but not more than 216 inches apart.

Except when authorized by a permit issued pursuant to Code Section 32-6-28 and except as otherwise provided in this Code section:

No vehicle equipped with high pressure pneumatic, solid rubber, or cushion tires and operated upon any public road of this state shall carry a load on any wheel which exceeds 8,000 pounds by more than 13 percent or a load on any single axle which exceeds 16,000 pounds by more than 13 percent; and

No vehicle equipped with low pressure pneumatic tires and operated upon any public road of this state shall carry a load on any wheel which exceeds 9,000 pounds by more than 13 percent or a load on any single axle which exceeds 18,000 pounds by more than 13 percent.

On all highways within this state which are not interstate highways, the maximum total gross weight authorized for any vehicle and load shall not exceed 80,000 pounds; the maximum load authorized on any single axle shall be as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section; the maximum load on any tandem axle shall be 40,680 pounds; and subject to subparagraph (B) and subparagraph (C) of this paragraph, the maximum total gross weight authorized for any vehicle and load shall be the maximum load authorized on any single axle multiplied by the number of axles with which the vehicle is equipped.

For vehicles and loads with an actual total gross weight between 73,280 pounds and 80,000 pounds, the maximum total gross weight authorized for the vehicle and load shall be determined by applying the state bridge formula.

For any vehicle equipped with four axles, the maximum total gross weight authorized for the vehicle and load shall be 70,000 pounds.

Reserved.

No lift axle may be used in computing the maximum total gross weight authorized for any vehicle or load.

On all highways within this state which are interstate highways, the maximum total gross weight authorized for any vehicle and load shall not exceed 80,000 pounds; the maximum load authorized on any single axle shall be as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section; and, except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, the maximum overall gross weight in pounds on a group of two or more consecutive axles shall be determined by applying the federal bridge formula. In applying the formula, no lift axle shall be counted as an individual or additional axle when determining the maximum overall gross weight.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, the maximum load authorized on any tandem axle shall be 34,000 pounds, and any two consecutive sets of tandem axles may carry a gross load of 34,000 pounds each if the overall distance between the first and last axles of such consecutive sets of tandem axles is 36 feet or more; however, except for vehicles and combinations of vehicles exceeding 55 feet in length, the maximum gross weight authorized on a tandem axle for a vehicle or combination of vehicles carrying a gross weight of less than 73,280 pounds shall be 40,680 pounds.

If at any time federal law authorizes any weight greater than that authorized by this subsection, such greater weight under federal law shall be authorized on the interstate highways within this state.

Subject to the provisions of this article, the department shall be authorized, on behalf of the state, to enter into agreements with the United States Secretary of Transportation as provided in Section 127 of Title 23 of the United States Code, relating to the control of vehicle weight and width limitations, which agreements shall exempt certain vehicles from the requirements of subsection (d) of this Code section. The department shall be authorized to take action in the name of the state to comply with the terms of any such agreement and to promulgate any rules and regulations necessary to ensure the department’s compliance with federal laws and to provide for the issuance of the special permits required by this Code section.

On any public road of a county road system, the maximum total gross weight of a vehicle and load shall not exceed 56,000 pounds unless the vehicle is making a pickup or delivery on such road; except that if a county road is constructed to the same standards as those highways of this state which are interstate highways and is authorized as a designated local truck route pursuant to official resolution of the county, the maximum weight limits for such designated local truck route shall be the same as those for highways in this state which are not interstate highways as provided by paragraph (1) of subsection (c) of this Code section. The county shall notify the department of any roads designated by the county as a local truck route within 90 days of such designation.

The weight limitations provided for in this Code section, except the limitation in subsections (f) and (h) of this Code section, may be exceeded on any public road within this state which is not an interstate highway, or when making a pickup or delivery on any public road of a county road system, without a permit only when the load on any single axle does not exceed 23,000 pounds, the load on any tandem axle does not exceed 46,000 pounds, and the maximum total gross weight of the vehicle and load does not exceed 80,000 pounds when:

Hauling forest products from the forest where cut to the first point of marketing or processing;

Hauling live poultry or cotton from a farm to a processing plant;

Hauling feed from a feed mill to a farm;

Hauling granite, either block or sawed, or any other naturally occurring raw ore or mineral for further processing, from the quarry or stockpile area to a processing plant located in the same or an adjoining county and construction aggregates hauled to any point, unless otherwise prohibited;

Hauling solid waste or recovered materials from points of generation to a solid waste handling facility or other processing facility;

Hauling concrete that is in a freshly mixed and unhardened state for delivery to a customer; or

Hauling poultry waste from the point of origin to a farm.

No lift axle may be used in computing the maximum total gross weight authorized for any vehicle or load under this paragraph.

A vehicle which is hauling the products listed in subparagraphs (A) through (F) of paragraph (1) of this subsection or which is hauling any other agricultural or farm product from a farm to the first point of marketing or processing shall be permitted a 5 percent variance from the weight limitations in paragraph (1) of this subsection within a 100 mile radius of the farm or point of origin. Any person who violates the load limitations provided for in this paragraph by exceeding the 5 percent variance per single axle, tandem axle, or maximum total gross weight shall be fined on the basis of the weight limitations of paragraph (1) of this subsection, including the variance allowed by this paragraph.

A vehicle which is hauling the products listed in subparagraph (G) of paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be permitted a 5 percent variance from the weight limitations in paragraph (1) of this subsection within a 250 mile radius of the farm or point of origin. Any person who violates the load limitations provided for in this paragraph by exceeding the 5 percent variance per single axle, tandem axle, or maximum total gross weight shall be fined on the basis of the weight limitations of paragraph (1) of this subsection and not on the basis of the variance allowed by this paragraph.

Any vehicle carrying a load as authorized in this subsection at night shall be equipped with lights clearly visible for a distance of not less than 300 feet from the front and rear of the vehicle.

Notwithstanding any provision of this Code section to the contrary, no vehicle or combination of vehicles shall be operated over any bridge with a posted limit which is less than the total gross weight of the vehicle and its load.

Any vehicle which can be made to comply with the requirements of this Code section by shifting the load and which is then loaded to comply with this Code section shall not be held to be in violation of this Code section.

On all highways within this state which are not interstate highways:

Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, for all vehicles, fines for violations of the total gross weight limitations provided for in subsection (c) of this Code section shall be based on the amount by which the actual weight of the vehicle and load exceeds the allowable maximum weight determined under subsection (c) of this Code section.

For vehicles equipped with four axles, fines for violations of the total gross weight limitations provided for in subsection (c) of this Code section shall be based on the amount by which the actual weight of the vehicle and load exceeds 70,000 pounds.

Except as provided in subsections (f) and (h) of this Code section, weight limits and axle definitions for any bimodal semitrailer, semitrailers, and trailers operated on highways and public roads within this state shall be weight limits and axle definitions authorized by federal law governing interstate highways.

Display Image

FORMULA

FORMULA

Display Image

History.

Ga. L. 1927, p. 226, § 16; Ga. L. 1931, Ex. Sess., p. 114, § 2; Code 1933, §§ 68-402, 68-702; Ga. L. 1941, p. 449, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1955, p. 392, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1956, p. 83, § 2; Ga. L. 1964, p. 83, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 30, §§ 1, 2; Code 1933, § 95A-959, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1111, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 68, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1965, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1989, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 576, § 4; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 23; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1798, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1984, p. 621, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 414, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 693, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 862, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1512, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1206, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 136, § 32; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1484, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 366, § 22; Ga. L. 2005, p. 601, § 2/SB 160; Ga. L. 2005, p. 822, § 1/HB 279; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 32/SB 465; Ga. L. 2006, p. 292, § 1/HB 1106; Ga. L. 2007, p. 237, § 1/HB 536; Ga. L. 2008, p. 155, § 1/HB 981; Ga. L. 2011, p. 548, § 1/SB 54; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 32/HB 942; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1343, § 7/HB 817.

Cross references.

Posting of bridge weight limit on county road, §

32-4-41

.

Posting of bridge weight limit on municipal street, §

32-4-91

.

Designated local truck route signs, §

32-6-50

.